Virginia statutes. Title 55.1. Property and Conveyances.
Article 3. Protection of Purchasers.

§ 55.1-2217.
Public offering statement.

Prior to the execution of a contract for the purchase of a time-share, the developer shall prepare and distribute to each prospective purchaser a copy of the current public offering statement regarding the time-share program. The public offering statement shall (i) fully and accurately disclose the material characteristics of the time-share program registered under this chapter and such time-share offered and (ii) make known to each prospective purchaser all material circumstances affecting such time-share program. A developer need not make joint disclosures concerning two or more time-share projects owned by the developer or any related entity unless such projects are included in the same time-share program and marketed jointly at any of the time-share projects. The proposed public offering statement shall be filed with the Board and shall be in a form prescribed by its regulations. The public offering statement may limit the information provided for the specific time-share project to which the developer’s registration relates. The public offering statement shall include the following only to the extent that a given disclosure is applicable:

The name and principal address of the developer, including:

The name, principal occupation, and address of every director, partner, limited liability company manager, or trustee of the developer;

The name and address of each person owning or controlling an interest of 20 percent or more in each time-share project included in the registration;

The particulars of any indictment, conviction, judgment, or order of any court or administrative agency against the developer or managing entity for violation of a federal, state, local, or foreign country law or regulation in connection with activities relating to time-share sales, land sales, land investments, security sales, construction or sale of homes or improvements, or any similar or related activity;

The nature of each unsatisfied judgment, if any, against the developer or the managing entity, the status of each pending action involving the sale or management of real estate to which the developer, the managing entity, or any general partner, executive officer, director, limited liability company manager, or majority stockholder thereof is a defending party, and the status of each pending action, if any, of significance to any time-share project included in the registration; and

The name and address of the developer’s agent for service of any notice permitted by this chapter.

A statement to the effect of whether or not the developer has reserved the right to add to or delete from the time-share program a time-share project or any incidental benefit; and

If the developer utilizes the possibility of reverter, a statement to that effect referring the purchaser to the reverter deed for an explanation of such possibility of reverter.

If any prospective purchaser is offered the opportunity to subscribe to or participate in any exchange program, the public offering statement shall include, as an exhibit or supplement, the disclosure document prepared by the exchange company in accordance with §

55.1-2219

and a brief narrative description of the exchange program, which shall include the following:

A statement of whether membership or participation in the program is voluntary or mandatory;

The name and address of the exchange company together with the names of its top three officers and directors;

A statement of whether the exchange company or any of its top three officers, directors, or holders of a 10 percent or greater interest in the exchange company has any interest in the developer, the managing entity, or the time-share program;

A statement that the purchaser’s contract with the exchange company is a contract separate and distinct from the purchaser’s contract with the developer; and

A brief narrative description of the procedure by which exchanges are conducted.

The public offering statement of a conversion time-share project shall also include the following, which may take the form of an exhibit to the public offering statement:

A specific statement of the amount of any initial or special fee, if any, due from the purchaser of a time-share on or before settlement of the purchase contract and the basis of such fee occasioned by the fact that the project is a conversion time-share project;

Information on the actual expenditures, if available, made on all repairs, maintenance, operation, or upkeep of any building in the time-share project within the last three years. This information shall be set forth in a tabular manner within the proposed budget of the project. If any such building has not been occupied for a period of three years, the information shall be set forth for the period during which such building was occupied;

A description of any provisions made in the budget for reserves for capital expenditures and an explanation of the basis for such reserves occasioned by the fact that the project is a conversion time-share project, or, if no provision is made for such reserves, a statement to that effect; and

A statement of the present condition of all structural components and major utility installations in the building, which statement shall include the approximate dates of construction, installations, and major repairs as well as the expected useful life of each such item, together with the estimated cost, in current dollars, of replacing each such component.

In the case of a conversion time-share project, the developer shall give at least 90 days’ notice to each of the tenants of any building that the developer intends to submit to the provisions of this chapter. During the first 60 days of such 90-day period, each of these tenants shall have the exclusive right to contract for the purchase of a time-share from the unit he occupies, but only if such unit is to be retained in the conversion time-share project without substantial alteration in its physical layout. Such notice shall be hand delivered or sent by first-class mail, return receipt requested, and shall inform the tenants of the developer’s intent to create a conversion time-share project. Such notice may also constitute the notice to terminate the tenancy as provided for in §

55.1-1410

, except that, despite the provisions of §

55.1-1410

, a tenancy from month to month may only be terminated upon 120 days’ notice as set forth in this subsection when such termination is in regard to the creation of a conversion time-share project. If, however, a tenant so notified remains in possession of the unit he occupies after the expiration of the 120-day period with the permission of the developer, in order to then terminate the tenancy, such developer shall give the tenant a further notice as provided in § 55.1-1410.The developer of a conversion time-share project shall, in addition to the requirements of §

55.1-2239

, include with the application for registration a copy of the notice required by this subsection and a certified statement that such notice that fully complies with the provisions of this subsection shall be, at the time of the registration, mailed or delivered to each of the tenants in any building for which registration is sought.

The developer shall amend the public offering statement to reflect any material change in the time-share program. If the developer has reserved in the time-share instrument the right to add to or delete incidental benefits or alternative purchases, the addition or deletion of such benefits or purchases shall not constitute a material change. Prior to distribution, the developer shall file with the Board the public offering statement amended to reflect any material change.

The Board may at any time require a developer to alter or supplement the form or substance of the public offering statement to assure full and fair disclosure to prospective purchasers. A developer may prepare and distribute a public offering statement for each time-share program offered or one public offering statement for all time-share programs offered.

The developer shall amend the public offering statement to reflect any addition of a time-share project to, or removal of a time-share project from, the existing time-share program.

In the case of a time-share project located outside the Commonwealth, similar disclosure statements required by other situs laws governing time-sharing may be accepted by the Board as alternative disclosure statements to satisfy the requirements of this section.

The public offering statement may be in any format, including any electronic format, provided that the prospective buyer has available for review, along with ample time for any questions and answers, a copy of the public offering statement prior to his execution of a contract.

2.

A general description of the time-share projects included in the time-share program. The description shall include the address of each time-share project, the units, and common elements for each project promised available to purchasers, including the developer’s estimated schedule of commencement and completion of all promised and incomplete time-share units and common elements.

3.

As to all time-shares offered by the developer:

a.

The form of time-share ownership offered in the time-share program;

b.

The types, duration, and number of units and time-shares in the time-share program;

c.

Identification of time-share units that are subject to the time-share program;

d.

The estimated number of time-share units that may become subject to the time-share program;

e.

Provisions, if any, that have been made for public utilities in the time-share project including water, electricity, telephone, and sewerage facilities;

4.

In a time-share estate program, a copy of the annual report or budget required by §

55.1-2213

, which copy may take the form of an exhibit to the public offering statement. In the case where multiple time-share projects are included in the time-share program, the copy or exhibit may be in summary form.

5.

In a time-share use program where the developer’s net worth is no more than $250,000, a current audited balance sheet and, where the developer’s net worth exceeds such amount, a statement by such developer that its equity in the time-share program exceeds that amount.

6.

Any initial or special fee due from the purchaser at settlement together with a description of the purpose and method of calculating the fee.

7.

A description of any liens, defects, or encumbrances affecting the time-share project and in particular the time-share offered to the purchaser.

8.

A general description of any financing offered by or available through the developer.

9.

A statement that the purchaser has a nonwaivable right of cancellation, referring such purchaser to that portion of the contract in which such right may be found.

10.

If the time-share interest in a condominium unit may be conveyed before that condominium unit is certified as substantially complete in accordance with §

55.1-1920

, a statement of the developer’s obligation to complete the condominium unit. Such statement shall include the approximate date by which the condominium unit shall be completed, together with the form and amount of the bond filed in accordance with subsection B of §

55.1-1921

.

11.

Any restraints on alienation of any number or portion of any time-shares.

12.

A description of the insurance coverage provided for the benefit of time-share owners.

13.

The extent to which financial arrangements, if any, have been provided for completion of any incomplete but promised time-share unit or common element being then offered for sale, including a statement of the developer’s obligation to complete the promised units and common elements that the time-share project comprises that have not begun or that have begun but have not yet been completed.

14.

The extent to which a time-share unit may become subject to a tax or other lien arising out of claims against other owners of the same unit.

15.

The name and address of the managing entity for each project in the time-share program.

16.

Copies of the time-share instrument and the association’s articles of incorporation and bylaws, each of which may be a supplement to the public offering statement.

17.

Any services that the developer provides or expense it pays and that it expects may become at any subsequent time a time-share expense of the owners, and the projected time-share expense liability attributable to each of those services or expenses for each time-share.

18.

A description of the terms of the deposit escrow requirements, including a statement that deposits may be removed from escrow at the termination of the cancellation period.

19.

A description of the facilities, if any, provided by the developer to the association in a time-share estate project for the management of the project.

20.

Any other information required by the Board to assure full and fair meaningful disclosure to prospective purchasers.

History.

1981, c. 462, § 55-374; 1983, c. 59; 1984, c. 455; 1985, c. 517; 1986, c. 359; 1989, c. 637; 1994, c. 580; 1998, c. 460; 1999, c. 560; 2001, c. 543; 2004, c. 143; 2006, c. 653; 2007, c. 267; 2014, cc. 39, 716; 2019, c. 712; 2020, c. 1011.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1011, in subsection A, added “program” at the end of the first sentence and substituted “time-share program” for “time-share project” twice in the second sentence and made similar changes throughout the section; in the introductory paragraph of subdivision A 1, deleted “and the time share project registered with the Board about which the public offering statement relates” following “developer”; substituted “included in the registration” for “registered with the Board” in subdivisions A 1 b and d; rewrote subdivision A 2 to delete reference to Board registration and add the address requirement; substituted “time-share program” for “project registered with the Board” in subdivisions A 3 a and b; deleted “or alternative purchase” following “benefit” in subdivision A 3 f; substituted “time-share instrument” for “project instrument” in subdivision A 16; deleted “or time-share project” at the end of the first sentence in subsection E; substituted “time-share program” for “product” and “time-share programs” for “products” in the second sentence of subsection F; inserted subsection G, and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; rewrote present subsection H, which formerly read: “In the case of a time-share project located outside the Commonwealth, (i) the developer may amend the public offering statement to reflect any additions or deletions of a time-share project to the existing time-share program registered in the Commonwealth and (ii) similar disclosure statements required by other situs laws governing time-sharing may be acceptable alternative disclosure statements”; and made technical changes throughout the section.

§ 55.1-2218.
Certain advertising practices regulated.

Any offering that includes a gift or prize shall disclose in such offering, with the same prominence as such offer:

The retail value of each gift or prize;

The approximate odds against any given person obtaining each gift or prize if all persons to whom the advertisement is disseminated do what is necessary to qualify for the award of the gift or prize;

If the number of gifts or prizes to be awarded is limited, a statement of the number of gifts or prizes to be awarded or, in lieu of such statement, the nature of such limitation;

All rules, terms, requirements, and conditions that shall be fulfilled before a prospective purchaser may claim any gift or prize, including whether the prospective purchaser is required to attend a sales presentation in order to receive the gift or prize;

The date upon which the offer expires; and

A statement to the effect that the offer is being made for the purpose of soliciting the purchase of a time-share, time-share interest, interval ownership, interval ownership interest, vacation ownership, vacation ownership interest, or product, as appropriate.

Any gift or prize offered in connection with an offering shall be delivered to the prospective purchaser no later than the day the purchaser attends a sales presentation, if required, and if not, on the day the purchaser appears to claim it, whether or not he purchases a time-share. In the event that the supply of gifts or prizes is exhausted at the time required for delivery, the developer shall give the prospective purchaser a written, unconditional promise to deliver such gift or prize no later than 30 days from the date required for delivery. If such gift or prize is not obtainable, the developer shall deliver an item of equal or greater value.

The offering or sale of any product registered with the Board is exempt from the Virginia Securities Act (§

13.1-501

et seq.), Chapter 9 (§

55.1-900

et seq.), the Virginia Condominium Act (§

55.1-1900

et seq.), the Subdivided Land Sales Act (§

55.1-2300

et seq.), the Virginia Home Solicitation Sales Act (§ 59.1-21.1 et seq.), the Prizes and Gifts Act (§ 59.1-415 et seq.), and the Virginia Travel Club Act (§ 59.1-445 et seq.).

History.

1983, c. 59, § 55-374.1; 1984, c. 333; 1985, c. 517; 1991, c. 704; 1994, c. 580; 1996, c. 372; 1998, c. 460; 2006, c. 653; 2008, cc. 851, 871; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2219.
Exchange programs.

Any exchange company that offers an exchange program in the Commonwealth shall prepare and register with the Board a disclosure document including the following:

The name and address of the exchange company;

The names and addresses of the top three officers and all directors of the exchange company and, if the exchange company is privately held, all shareholders owning five percent or more interest in the exchange company;

Whether the exchange company or any of its officers or directors has any legal or beneficial interest in any developer or managing agent for any time-share program participating in the exchange program and, if so, the name and location of the time-share project and the nature of the interest;

Unless the exchange company is also the developer or an affiliate, a statement that the purchaser’s contract with the exchange company is a contract separate and distinct from the sales contract;

Whether the purchaser’s participation in the exchange program is dependent upon the continued affiliation of the time-share program with the exchange program;

Whether the purchaser’s membership or participation, or both, in the exchange program is voluntary or mandatory;

A complete and accurate description of the terms and conditions of the purchaser’s contractual relationship with the exchange company and the procedure by which changes in the terms and conditions of the exchange contract may be made;

A complete and accurate description of the procedure to qualify for and effectuate exchanges;

A complete and accurate description of all limitations, restrictions, or priorities employed in the operation of the exchange program, including limitations on exchanges based on seasonality, time-share unit size, or levels of occupancy, expressed in boldface type, and, in the event that such limitations, restrictions, or priorities are not uniformly applied by the exchange program, a clear description of the manner in which they are applied;

Whether exchanges are arranged on a space available basis and whether any guarantees of fulfillment of specific requests for exchanges are made by the exchange program;

Whether and under what circumstances an owner, in dealing with the exchange company, may lose the use of occupancy of his time-share in any properly-applied-for exchange, without being provided with substitute accommodations by the exchange company;

The fees or range of fees for participation by time-share owners in the exchange program, a statement of whether any such fees may be altered by the exchange company, and the circumstances under which alterations may be made;

The name and address of the site of each time-share project, accommodation, or facility participating in the exchange program;

The number of time-share units in each property participating in the exchange program that are available for occupancy and that qualify for participation in the exchange program, expressed within the following numerical groupings:

1-5

, 6-10, 11-20, 21-50, and 51 and over;

The number of owners with respect to each time-share program or other property who are eligible to participate in the exchange program, expressed within the numerical groupings 1-100, 101-249, 250-499, 500-999, and 1,000 and over, and a statement of the criteria used to determine those owners currently eligible to participate in the exchange program;

The disposition made by the exchange company of time-shares deposited with the exchange program by owners eligible to participate in the exchange program and not used by the exchange company in effecting exchanges;

The following information, which, except as provided in subsection B, shall be independently audited by a certified public accountant or accounting firm in accordance with the standards of the Auditing Standards Board of the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants and reported for each year no later than July 1 of the succeeding year:

The number of owners enrolled in the exchange program. Such numbers shall disclose the relationship between the exchange company and owners as being either fee paying or gratuitous in nature;

The number of time-share projects, accommodations, or facilities eligible to participate in the exchange program;

The percentage of confirmed exchanges, which shall be the number of exchanges confirmed by the exchange company divided by the number of exchanges properly applied for, together with a complete and accurate statement of the criteria used to determine whether an exchange request was properly applied for;

The number of time-shares for which the exchange company has an outstanding obligation to provide an exchange to an owner who relinquished a time-share during the year in exchange for a time-share in any future year; and

The number of exchanges confirmed by the exchange company during the year.

The information required by subsection A shall be accurate as of a date that is no more than 30 days prior to the date on which the information is delivered to the purchaser, except that the information required by subdivisions A 2, 12, 13, 14, 15, and 16 shall be accurate as of December 31 of the preceding year if the information is delivered between July 1 and December 31 of any year; information delivered between January 1 and June 30 of any year shall be accurate as of December 31 of the year prior to the preceding year. At no time shall such information be accurate as of a date that is more than 18 months prior to the date of delivery. As used in this section, “year” means calendar year.

In the event that an exchange company offers an exchange program directly to the purchaser, the exchange company shall deliver to such purchaser, simultaneously with such offering and prior to the execution of any contract between the purchaser and the exchange company, the information set forth in subsection A. The requirements of this subsection shall not apply to any renewal of a contract between a purchaser and an exchange company.

Each exchange company shall include the statement set forth in subdivision A 18 on all promotional brochures, pamphlets, advertisements, or other materials disseminated by the exchange company that also contain the percentage of confirmed exchanges described in subdivision A 17 c.

An exchange company shall, on or before July 1 of each year, file with the Board and the association for the time-share program in which the time-shares are offered or disposed the information required by this section with respect to the preceding year. If the Board determines that any of the information supplied fails to meet the requirements of this section, the Board may undertake enforcement action against the exchange company in accordance with the provisions of Article 6 (§

55.1-2247

et seq.). No developer shall have any liability arising out of the use, delivery, or publication by the developer of written information provided to it by the exchange company pursuant to this section. Except for written information provided to the developer by the exchange company, no exchange company shall have any liability with respect to (i) any representation made by the developer relating to the exchange program or exchange company or (ii) the use, delivery, or publication by the developer of any information relating to the exchange program or exchange company. The failure of the exchange company to observe the requirements of this section, or the use by it of any unfair or deceptive act or practice in connection with the operation of the exchange program, shall be a violation of this section.

The Board may establish by regulation reasonable fees for registration of the exchange program. All fees shall be remitted by the Board to the State Treasurer and shall be placed to the credit of the Common Interest Community Management Information Fund established pursuant to §

54.1-2354.2

.

18.

A statement in boldface type to the effect that the percentage described in subdivision 17 c is a summary of the exchange requests entered with the exchange company in the period reported and that the percentage does not indicate a purchaser’s or owner’s probabilities of being confirmed to any specific choice or range of choices, since availability at individual locations may vary.

History.

1985, c. 517, § 55-374.2; 1998, c. 460; 2008, cc. 851, 871; 2019, c. 712; 2020, c. 1011.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1011 substituted “time-share program” for “time-share project” in subdivision A 5; inserted “time-share” preceding “unit” and “units” in subdivisions A 9 and 14; substituted “time-share owners” for “owners” in subdivision A 12; substituted “time-share project” for “time-share property” in subdivision A 13; substituted “time-share projects” for “time-share properties” in subdivision A 17 b; and substituted “program” for “company disclosure document” in the first sentence of subsection F.

§ 55.1-2220.
Escrow of deposits; use of corporate surety bond or irrevocable letter of credit.

Any deposit made in connection with the purchase or reservation of a product shall be held in escrow. All deposits shall be held in escrow until (i) delivered to the developer upon expiration of the purchaser’s cancellation period provided the purchaser’s right of cancellation has not been exercised, (ii) delivered to the developer because of the purchaser’s default under a contract to purchase a time-share, or (iii) refunded to the purchaser. Such funds shall be deposited in a separate account designated for this purpose that is federally insured and located in the Commonwealth; except where such deposits are being held by a real estate broker or attorney licensed under the laws of the Commonwealth, such funds may be placed in that broker’s or attorney’s regular escrow account and need not be placed in a separate designated account. Such escrow funds shall not be subject to attachment by the creditors of either the purchaser or the developer.

In lieu of escrowing deposits as provided in subsection A, the developer of a time-share project consisting of more than 25 units may:

Obtain and maintain a corporate surety bond issued by a surety authorized to do business in the Commonwealth, in the form and amount set forth in subsection C; or

Obtain and maintain an irrevocable letter of credit issued by a financial institution whose accounts are insured by the FDIC, in the form and amount set forth in subsection D.The surety bond or letter of credit shall be maintained until (i) the expiration of the purchaser’s cancellation period, (ii) the purchaser’s default under a purchase contract for the time-share estate entitling the developer to retain the deposit, or (iii) the refund of the deposit to the time-share purchaser, whichever occurs first.

The surety bond shall be payable to the Commonwealth for the use and benefit of every person protected under the provisions of this chapter. The developer shall file the bond with the Board. The surety bond may be either in the form of an individual bond for each deposit accepted by the developer or, if the total amount of the deposits accepted by the developer under this chapter exceeds $10,000, it may be in the form of a blanket bond. If the bond is a blanket bond, the amount shall be as follows. If the amount of such deposits is:

More than $10,000 but not more than $75,000, the blanket bond shall be $75,000;

More than $75,000 but less than $200,000, the blanket bond shall be $200,000;

$200,000 or more but less than $500,000, the blanket bond shall be $500,000;

$500,000 or more but less than $1 million, the blanket bond shall be $1 million; and

$1 million or more, the blanket bond shall be 100 percent of the amount of such deposits.

The letter of credit shall be payable to the Commonwealth for the use and benefit of every person protected under this chapter. The developer shall file the letter of credit with the Board. The letter of credit may be either in the form of an individual letter of credit for each deposit accepted by the developer or, if the total amount of the deposits accepted by the developer under this chapter exceeds $10,000, it may be in the form of a blanket letter of credit. If the letter of credit is a blanket letter of credit, the amount shall be as follows. If the amount of such deposits is:

More than $10,000 but not more than $75,000, the blanket letter of credit shall be $75,000;

More than $75,000 but less than $200,000, the blanket letter of credit shall be $200,000;

$200,000 or more but less than $500,000, the blanket letter of credit shall be $500,000;

$500,000 or more but less than $1 million, the blanket letter of credit shall be $1 million; and

$1 million or more, the blanket letter of credit shall be 100 percent of the amount of such deposits.For the purposes of determining the amount of any blanket letter of credit that a developer maintains in any calendar year, the total amount of deposits considered held by the developer shall be determined as of May 31 in each calendar year and the amount of the letter of credit shall be in accordance with the amount of deposits held as of May 31.

The developer shall disclose in the contract or in the public offering that the deposit may not be held in escrow or protected by a surety bond or letter of credit after expiration of the cancellation period and that such deposit is not protected as an escrow after expiration of the cancellation period. This disclosure shall include a statement of whether or not the developer reserves the option to sell or assign any promissory note given by a purchaser to another entity, whether or not such entity is affiliated with the developer. Both disclosures shall appear in boldface type of a minimum size of 10 points.

History.

1981, c. 462, § 55-375; 1984, c. 429; 1985, c. 517; 1994, c. 580; 1998, c. 460; 2006, c. 653; 2008, cc. 851, 871; 2018, cc. 33, 133; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2221.
Purchaser’s rights of cancellation.

A purchaser shall have the right to cancel the contract until midnight of the seventh calendar day following the execution of such contract. If the seventh calendar day falls on a Sunday or legal holiday, then the right to cancel the contract shall expire on the day immediately following that Sunday or legal holiday. Cancellation shall be without penalty, and all payments made by the purchaser before cancellation shall be refunded within 45 days after receipt of the notice of cancellation.

If the purchaser elects to cancel a contract pursuant to subsection A, he shall do so only (i) by hand-delivering the notice to the developer at its principal office or at the project or (ii) by mailing the notice by certified United States mail, return receipt requested, to the developer or its agent designated in the contract. Any such notice sent by certified mail shall be effective on the date postmarked.

If, because of the occurrence of a material change, the public offering statement is amended between the time of contracting to purchase a time-share and the time of settlement, the developer shall provide the amended public offering statement to the purchaser and the right of cancellation shall renew from the date of delivery of such amended public offering statement. This subsection shall not apply if the public offering statement is amended by the developer because of a change that is not material or to disclose any change that is an aspect or result of the orderly development of the time-share project in accordance with the project instrument.

The right to cancel the contract as provided by this section shall not be waivable by the time-share purchaser and any provision in the contract or time-share documents indicating a waiver shall be void.

A statement of the purchaser’s right of cancellation as set forth in subsections A and B shall appear in the contract above the purchaser’s signature line. Such statement shall appear in type no smaller than any other provisions of the contract, and the caption “PURCHASER’S NONWAIVABLE RIGHT TO CANCEL” shall appear immediately preceding it in conspicuous, boldface type.

History.

1981, c. 462, § 55-376; 1983, c. 147; 1984, c. 572; 1985, c. 517; 1991, c. 704; 1994, c. 580; 1998, c. 460; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.